Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202682-317
Public buildings; artwork; declaration of policy.

The Legislature recognizes the responsibility of the state to foster culture and the arts and its interest in the viable development of its artists. The Legislature declares it to be the policy of this state that a portion of all appropriations made after January 1, 1979, for capital expenditures be set aside for the acquisition of artworks to be used in public buildings except as otherwise provided in section 82-319.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 31.